Washington statutes.
RCW 10.29.110

Duties of special prosecutor or designee.

The special prosecutor or his or her designee shall:

(1) Attend all proceedings of the statewide special inquiry judge;

(2) Have the authority to issue subpoenas for witnesses statewide;

(3) Examine witnesses, present evidence, draft reports as directed by the statewide special inquiry judge, and draft and file informations under RCW 10.29.120.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1028; 1980 c 146 s 11.]